Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 2. Durable Power of Attorney for Health Care

§ 3-5-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-206.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-207.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

§ 3-5-208.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

§ 3-5-209.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-212.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 3-5-213.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see title 35, chapter 22, article 4.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 207, § 3, pertained to the durable power of attorney for health care.

Laws 2005, ch. 161, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.